North Dakota, session 69, SB2110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 23.1-07-04 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. A certificate issued under this chapter is valid for only one year and expires on the first day of
JulyJanuary of the year after which it was issued.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 23.1-07-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23.1-07-05. Fees.
The department may charge a fee for certificates issued under this chapter, but the fees may not
exceed fifty dollars for the initial certificate, or twenty-five dollars for the annual renewal certificateby
rule may prescribe and provide for the payment and collection of reasonable fees for certificates issued
under this chapter. The fees must be based on the anticipated cost of filing and processing applications
for operator certification, preparing and administering examinations, and the annual renewal of
certificates. All receipts from the fees must be deposited in the state treasury to be credited to a special
fund to be known as the "operators' certification fund" to be used by the department to administer and
enforce this chapter and financially assist the department in conducting operator training programs. Any
surplus at the end of the fiscal year must be retained by the department for future expenditures.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 23.1-07-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23.1-07-06. Duties of the department.
The department shall:
1. Hold at least one examination each year, administered by the department or a third-party
examination service, at a designated time and place for the purpose of examining candidates
for certification.
2. Promote the program of certification of water supply and wastewater disposal system
operators.
3. Distribute notices and applications and to receive and evaluate applications.
4. Collect fees for initial certification and annual renewal.
5. Prepare, conduct, and grade examinations. The department may use a third-party
examination service to prepare, conduct, and grade examinations.

S. B. NO. 2110 - PAGE 2
6. Maintain records of operator qualifications, certification examination results, and a register of
certified operators.
7. Promote and schedule regular training schools and programs.
8. Adopt rules necessary to carry out this chapter.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 23.1-07-08 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
23.1-07-08. Violations - Penalty.
Any
1. A person that violates this chapter, a rule implementing this chapter, or an order issued by the
department under this chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars
per day of violation.
2. A person violatingthat willfully violates this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter,
after written notice of the violation by the department, is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
3. A person that willfully makes a false statement, representation, or certification in an
application, record, report, plan, or other document filed or required to be maintained under
this chapter or any rule, order, limitation, or other applicable requirement implementing this
chapter or that falsifies, tampers with, or willfully renders inaccurate any monitoring device or
sample is guilty of a class A misdemeanor, unless the penalty for the violation is otherwise
specifically provided for and made exclusive in this chapter.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 23.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Administrative procedure and judicial review.
1. A proceeding under this chapter to adopt or modify rules relating to the certification and
regulation of water distribution and wastewater system operators, or for determining
compliance with rules of the department, must be conducted in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 28 - 32 .
2. An appeal of a decision issued under subsection 1, must be conducted in accordance with the
provisions of chapter 28 - 32 .

S. B. NO. 2110 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2110.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 91 Nays 1 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State